Nebraska, session 109, LB355.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 13-1906, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-1906 (1) The Department of Economic Development shall distribute
financial assistance from the state, if available, to the various development
districts as they are certified in the manner prescribed in subsection (2) of
this section.
(2)(a) Fifty percent of the total sum allocated shall be divided equally
among the certified development districts. In certified districts formed by
regional councils, funds may be prorated among the cooperating regional
councils based upon a formula approved by the governing boards of each of the
cooperating regional councils and accepted by the department.
(b) Twenty percent of the total sum allocated shall be divided among the
certified development districts based upon their proportional share of the
population of all certified development districts in the state. For purposes of
this subdivision, population shall mean the number of residents as shown by the
latest federal decennial census, except that the population of a county shall
mean the number of residents in the unincorporated areas of the county as shown
by the latest federal decennial census or as determined by the Department of
Economic Development if such census data is not available.
(c) Thirty percent of the total sum allocated shall be divided among the
certified development districts based upon their proportional share of the
local governments located within all certified development districts.
(3) Distributions to newly certified development districts shall not
reduce financial assistance to previously funded development districts. State
financial assistance shall not exceed the total local dollars received by the
development district as verified by the department. For purposes of this
subsection, local dollars received shall mean the total local dues received by
a development district from any local government as a condition of membership
in a development district.
Sec. 2. Section 13-2610, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
13-2610 (1) Upon the annual certification under section 13-2609, the State
Treasurer shall transfer after the audit the amount certified to the Convention
Center Support Fund. The Convention Center Support Fund is created. Transfers
may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Any money in the Convention Center Support Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2)(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate from the fund to
any political subdivision for which an application for state assistance under
the Convention Center Facility Financing Assistance Act has been approved an
amount not to exceed (i) seventy percent of the state sales tax revenue
collected by retailers and operators doing business at such facilities on sales
at such facilities, state sales tax revenue collected on primary and secondary
box office sales of admissions to such facilities, and state sales tax revenue
collected by associated hotels and nearby retailers, (ii) one hundred fifty
million dollars for any one approved project, or (iii) the total cost of
acquiring, constructing, improving, repairing, replacing, or equipping the
eligible facilities of the political subdivision. State assistance shall not be
used for an operating subsidy.
(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature to appropriate from the
fund to any city of the metropolitan class for which an application for state
assistance under the Convention Center Facility Financing Assistance Act has
been approved an amount not to exceed the amount of money transferred to the
fund pursuant to subdivision (9)(a) of section 13-3108.
(3)(a) Ten percent of the funds appropriated to a city of the metropolitan
class under subdivision (2)(a) of this section and all of the funds
appropriated to a city of the metropolitan class under subdivision (2)(b) of
this section shall be equally distributed to areas with a high concentration of
poverty. Fifty-five percent of such funds shall be used to showcase important
historical aspects of such areas or areas within close geographic proximity of
-1-

LB355 LB355
2025 2025
the area with a high concentration of poverty and to assist with the reduction
of street and gang violence in such areas. Forty-five percent of such funds
shall be used to assist with small business and entrepreneurship growth in such
areas.
(b) Each area with a high concentration of poverty that has been
distributed funds under subdivision (3)(a) of this section shall establish a
development fund and form a committee which shall identify and research
potential projects to be completed in the area with a high concentration of
poverty or in an area within close geographic proximity of such area if the
project would have a significant or demonstrable impact on such area and make
final determinations on the use of the funds received for such projects.
(c) A committee formed under subdivision (3)(b) of this section shall
include the following members:
(i) The member of the city council whose district includes a majority of
the census tracts which each contain a percentage of persons below the poverty
line of greater than thirty percent, as determined by the most recent American
Community Survey 5-Year Estimate federal decennial census, within the area with
a high concentration of poverty;
(ii) The commissioner of the county whose district includes a majority of
the census tracts which each contain a percentage of persons below the poverty
line of greater than thirty percent, as determined by the most recent American
Community Survey 5-Year Estimate federal decennial census, within the area with
a high concentration of poverty;
(iii) Two residents of the area with a high concentration of poverty,
appointed by the two members of the committee described in subdivisions (3)(c)
(i) and (ii) of this section. Such resident members shall be appointed for
four-year terms. Each time a resident member is to be appointed pursuant to
this subdivision, the committee shall solicit applications from interested
individuals by posting notice of the open position on the city's website and on
the city's official social media accounts, if any, and by publishing the notice
in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation in the area with a high
concentration of poverty. Applications may be submitted to either of the
committee members described in subdivisions (3)(c)(i) and (ii) of this section.
Prior to making any appointment, the committee shall hold a public hearing in
the area with a high concentration of poverty. Notice of the hearing shall be
provided, at least seven days prior to the hearing, by posting the notice on
the city's website and on the city's official social media accounts, if any,
and by publishing the notice in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation
in the area with a high concentration of poverty; and
(iv) The member of the Legislature whose district includes a majority of
the census tracts which each contain a percentage of persons below the poverty
line of greater than thirty percent, as determined by the most recent American
Community Survey 5-Year Estimate federal decennial census, within the area with
a high concentration of poverty. The member described in this subdivision shall
be a nonvoting member of the committee.
(d) A committee formed under subdivision (3)(b) of this section shall
solicit project ideas from the public and shall hold a public hearing in the
area with a high concentration of poverty. Notice of a proposed hearing shall
be provided in accordance with the procedures for notice of a public hearing
pursuant to section 18-2115.01. The committee shall research potential projects
and make the final determination regarding the annual distribution of funding
to such projects.
(e) For any committee formed under subdivision (3)(b) of this section:
(i) The two committee members described in subdivisions (3)(c)(i) and (ii)
of this section shall share joint responsibility of all committee operations
and meetings. Applications for funding may be submitted to either of such
members; and
(ii) All applications, reports, and other records of the committee shall
be accessible to any member of the committee.
(f) Each recipient of funding from a committee formed under subdivision
(3)(b) of this section shall submit an itemized report to such committee on the
use of such funds. A recipient shall not be eligible to receive funding for
more than three consecutive years unless such recipient is able to justify
continued funding based on the following criteria:
(i) The number of people served by the project;
(ii) The relevance and scale of the project;
(iii) The desirability of the social or environmental outcomes of the
project and how such outcomes will be achievable and measurable;
(iv) The economic impact on the area with a high concentration of poverty;
and
(v) The recipient's sustainability plan.
(g) On or before July 1, 2022, and on or before July 1 of each year
thereafter, a committee formed under subdivision (3)(b) of this section shall
electronically submit a report to the Legislature which includes:
(i) A description of the projects that were funded during the most
recently completed calendar year;
(ii) A description of where such projects were located;
(iii) A description of the outcomes of such projects; and
(iv) A ten-year strategic plan on how the committee plans to meet the
goals described in subdivision (3)(a) of this section.
(h) For purposes of this subsection, an area with a high concentration of
poverty means an area within the corporate limits of a city of the metropolitan
class consisting of one or more contiguous census tracts, as determined by the
-2-

LB355 LB355
2025 2025
most recent American Community Survey 5-Year Estimate federal decennial census,
which contain a percentage of persons below the poverty line of greater than
thirty percent, and all census tracts contiguous to such tract or tracts , as
determined by the most recent federal decennial census.
(4)(a) Ten percent of the funds appropriated to a city of the primary
class under subdivision (2)(a) of this section may, if the city determines by
consent of the city council that such funds are not currently needed for the
purposes described in section 13-2604, be used as follows:
(i) For investment in the construction of qualified low-income housing
projects as defined in 26 U.S.C. 42, including qualified projects receiving
Nebraska affordable housing tax credits under the Affordable Housing Tax Credit
Act; or
(ii) If there are no such qualified low-income housing projects as defined
in 26 U.S.C. 42 being constructed or expected to be constructed within the
political subdivision, for investment in areas with a high concentration of
poverty to assist with low-income housing needs.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, an area with a high concentration of
poverty means an area within the corporate limits of a city of the primary
class consisting of one or more contiguous census tracts, as determined by the
most recent American Community Survey 5-Year Estimate, which contain a
percentage of persons below the poverty line of greater than thirty percent,
and all census tracts contiguous to such tract or tracts, as determined by the
most recent American Community Survey 5-Year Estimate.
(5) State assistance to the political subdivision shall no longer be
available upon the retirement of the bonds issued to acquire, construct,
improve, repair, replace, or equip all of the political subdivision's
facilities or any subsequent bonds that refunded the original issue or when
state assistance reaches the amount determined under subdivision (2)(a) of this
section, whichever comes first.
(6) The remaining thirty percent of state sales tax revenue collected by
retailers and operators doing business at such facilities on sales at such
facilities, state sales tax revenue collected on primary and secondary box
office sales of admissions to such facilities, and state sales tax revenue
collected by associated hotels and nearby retailers, shall be appropriated by
the Legislature to the Civic and Community Center Financing Fund. Upon the
annual certification required pursuant to section 13-2609 and following the
transfer to the Convention Center Support Fund required pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section, the State Treasurer shall transfer an amount equal to the
remaining thirty percent from the Convention Center Support Fund to the Civic
and Community Center Financing Fund.
(7) Any municipality that has applied for and received a grant of
assistance under the Civic and Community Center Financing Act may not receive
state assistance under the Convention Center Facility Financing Assistance Act.
Sec. 3. Section 18-2103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
18-2103 For purposes of the Community Development Law, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Area of operation means and includes the area within the corporate
limits of the city and such land outside the city as may come within the
purview of sections 18-2123 and 18-2123.01;
(2) Authority means any community redevelopment authority created pursuant
to section 18-2102.01 and any community development agency created pursuant to
section 18-2101.01 and does not include a limited community redevelopment
authority;
(3) Blighted area means an area (a) which, by reason of the presence of a
substantial number of deteriorated or deteriorating structures, existence of
defective or inadequate street layout, faulty lot layout in relation to size,
adequacy, accessibility, or usefulness, insanitary or unsafe conditions,
deterioration of site or other improvements, diversity of ownership, tax or
special assessment delinquency exceeding the fair value of the land, defective
or unusual conditions of title, improper subdivision or obsolete platting, or
the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other
causes, or any combination of such factors, substantially impairs or arrests
the sound growth of the community, retards the provision of housing
accommodations, or constitutes an economic or social liability and is
detrimental to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare in its present
condition and use and (b) in which there is at least one of the following
conditions: (i) Unemployment in the designated area is at least one hundred
twenty percent of the state or national average; (ii) the average age of the
residential or commercial units in the area is at least forty years; (iii) more
than half of the plotted and subdivided property in an area is unimproved land
that has been within the city for forty years and has remained unimproved
during that time; (iv) the per capita income of the area is lower than the
average per capita income of the city or village in which the area is
designated; or (v) the area has had either stable or decreasing population
based on the last two decennial censuses. In no event shall a city of the
metropolitan, primary, or first class designate more than thirty-five percent
of the city as blighted, a city of the second class shall not designate an area
larger than fifty percent of the city as blighted, and a village shall not
designate an area larger than one hundred percent of the village as blighted. A
redevelopment project involving a formerly used defense site as authorized
under section 18-2123.01, any area which is located within a good life district
established under the Good Life Transformational Projects Act, and any area
-3-

LB355 LB355
2025 2025
declared to be an extremely blighted area under section 18-2101.02 shall not
count towards the percentage limitations contained in this subdivision;
(4) Bonds means any bonds, including refunding bonds, notes, interim
certificates, debentures, or other obligations issued pursuant to the Community
Development Law except for bonds issued pursuant to section 18-2142.04;
(5) Business means any private business located in an enhanced employment
area;
(6) City means any city or incorporated village in the state;
(7) Clerk means the clerk of the city or village;
(8) Community redevelopment area means a substandard and blighted area
which the community redevelopment authority designates as appropriate for a
redevelopment project;
(9) Employee means a person employed at a business as a result of a
redevelopment project;
(10) Employer-provided health benefit means any item paid for by the
employer in total or in part that aids in the cost of health care services,
including, but not limited to, health insurance, health savings accounts, and
employer reimbursement of health care costs;
(11) Enhanced employment area means an area not exceeding six hundred
acres (a) within a community redevelopment area which is designated by an
authority as eligible for the imposition of an occupation tax or (b) not within
a community redevelopment area as may be designated under section 18-2142.04;
(12) Equivalent employees means the number of employees computed by (a)
dividing the total hours to be paid in a year by (b) the product of forty times
the number of weeks in a year;
(13) Extremely blighted area means a substandard and blighted area in
which: (a) The average rate of unemployment in the area during the period
covered by the most recent federal decennial census or American Community
Survey 5-Year Estimate is at least two hundred percent of the average rate of
unemployment in the state during the same period; and (b) the average poverty
rate in the area exceeds twenty percent for the total federal census tract or
tracts or federal census block group or block groups in the area;
(14) Federal government means the United States of America, or any agency
or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America;
(15) Governing body or local governing body means the city council, board
of trustees, or other legislative body charged with governing the municipality;
(16) Limited community redevelopment authority means a community
redevelopment authority created pursuant to section 18-2102.01 having only one
single specific limited pilot project authorized;
(17) Mayor means the mayor of the city or chairperson of the board of
trustees of the village;
(18) New investment means the value of improvements to real estate made in
an enhanced employment area by a developer or a business;
(19) Number of new employees means the number of equivalent employees that
are employed at a business as a result of the redevelopment project during a
year that are in excess of the number of equivalent employees during the year
immediately prior to the year that a redevelopment plan is adopted;
(20) Obligee means any bondholder, agent, or trustee for any bondholder,
or lessor demising to any authority, established pursuant to section
18-2102.01, property used in connection with a redevelopment project, or any
assignee or assignees of such lessor's interest or any part thereof, and the
federal government when it is a party to any contract with such authority;
(21) Occupation tax means a tax imposed under section 18-2142.02;
(22) Person means any individual, firm, partnership, limited liability
company, corporation, company, association, joint-stock association, or body
politic and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other similar
representative thereof;
(23) Public body means the state or any municipality, county, township,
board, commission, authority, district, or other political subdivision or
public body of the state;
(24) Real property means all lands, including improvements and fixtures
thereon, and property of any nature appurtenant thereto, or used in connection
therewith, and every estate, interest and right, legal or equitable, therein,
including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage, or otherwise,
and the indebtedness secured by such liens;
(25) Redeveloper means any person, partnership, or public or private
corporation or agency which enters or proposes to enter into a redevelopment
contract;
(26) Redevelopment contract means a contract entered into between an
authority and a redeveloper for the redevelopment of an area in conformity with
a redevelopment plan;
(27) Redevelopment plan means a plan, as it exists from time to time for
one or more community redevelopment areas, or for a redevelopment project,
which (a) conforms to the general plan for the municipality as a whole and (b)
is sufficiently complete to indicate such land acquisition, demolition and
removal of structures, redevelopment, improvements, and rehabilitation as may
be proposed to be carried out in the community redevelopment area, zoning and
planning changes, if any, land uses, maximum densities, and building
requirements;
(28) Redevelopment project means any work or undertaking in one or more
community redevelopment areas: (a) To acquire substandard and blighted areas or
portions thereof, including lands, structures, or improvements the acquisition
of which is necessary or incidental to the proper clearance, development, or
-4-

LB355 LB355
2025 2025
redevelopment of such substandard and blighted areas; (b) to clear any such
areas by demolition or removal of existing buildings, structures, streets,
utilities, or other improvements thereon and to install, construct, or
reconstruct streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds, public spaces, public
parking facilities, sidewalks or moving sidewalks, convention and civic
centers, bus stop shelters, lighting, benches or other similar furniture, trash
receptacles, shelters, skywalks and pedestrian and vehicular overpasses and
underpasses, enhancements to structures in the redevelopment plan area which
exceed minimum building and design standards in the community and prevent the
recurrence of substandard and blighted conditions, and any other necessary
public improvements essential to the preparation of sites for uses in
accordance with a redevelopment plan; (c) to sell, lease, or otherwise make
available land in such areas for residential, recreational, commercial,
industrial, or other uses, including parking or other facilities functionally
related or subordinate to such uses, or for public use or to retain such land
for public use, in accordance with a redevelopment plan; and may also include
the preparation of the redevelopment plan, the planning, survey, and other work
incident to a redevelopment project and the preparation of all plans and
arrangements for carrying out a redevelopment project; (d) to dispose of all
real and personal property or any interest in such property, or assets, cash,
or other funds held or used in connection with residential, recreational,
commercial, industrial, or other uses, including parking or other facilities
functionally related or subordinate to such uses, or any public use specified
in a redevelopment plan or project, except that such disposition shall be at
its fair value for uses in accordance with the redevelopment plan; (e) to
acquire real property in a community redevelopment area which, under the
redevelopment plan, is to be repaired or rehabilitated for dwelling use or
related facilities, repair or rehabilitate the structures, and resell the
property; (f) to carry out plans for a program of voluntary or compulsory
repair, rehabilitation, or demolition of buildings in accordance with the
redevelopment plan; and (g) in a rural community or in an extremely blighted
area within a municipality that is not a rural community, to carry out
construction of workforce housing;
(29) Redevelopment project valuation means the valuation for assessment of
the taxable real property in a redevelopment project last certified for the
year prior to the effective date of the provision authorized in section
18-2147;
(30) Rural community means any municipality in a county with a population
of fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent
federal decennial census;
(31) Substandard area means an area in which there is a predominance of
buildings or improvements, whether nonresidential or residential in character,
which, by reason of dilapidation, deterioration, age or obsolescence,
inadequate provision for ventilation, light, air, sanitation, or open spaces,
high density of population and overcrowding, or the existence of conditions
which endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any combination of
such factors, is conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant
mortality, juvenile delinquency, and crime, (which cannot be remedied through
construction of prisons), and is detrimental to the public health, safety,
morals, or welfare; and
(32) Workforce housing means:
(a) Housing that meets the needs of today's working families;
(b) Housing that is attractive to new residents considering relocation to
a rural community;
(c) Owner-occupied housing units that cost not more than two hundred
seventy-five thousand dollars to construct or rental housing units that cost
not more than two hundred thousand dollars per unit to construct. For purposes
of this subdivision (c), housing unit costs shall be updated annually by the
Department of Economic Development based upon the most recent increase or
decrease in the Producer Price Index for all commodities, published by the
United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics;
(d) Owner-occupied and rental housing units for which the cost to
substantially rehabilitate exceeds fifty percent of a unit's assessed value;
and
(e) Upper-story housing.
Sec. 4. Section 77-6831, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-6831 (1) A taxpayer shall be entitled to the sales and use tax
incentives contained in subsection (2) of this section if the taxpayer:
(a) Attains a cumulative investment in qualified property of at least five
million dollars and hires at least thirty new employees at the qualified
location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period;
(b) Attains a cumulative investment in qualified property of at least two
hundred fifty million dollars and hires at least two hundred fifty new
employees at the qualified location or locations before the end of the ramp-up
period; or
(c) Attains a cumulative investment in qualified property of at least
fifty million dollars at the qualified location or locations before the end of
the ramp-up period. To receive incentives under this subdivision, the taxpayer
must meet the following conditions:
(i) The average compensation of the taxpayer's employees at the qualified
location or locations for each year of the performance period must equal at
least one hundred fifty percent of the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage
-5-

LB355 LB355
2025 2025
for the year of application;
(ii) The taxpayer must offer to its employees who constitute full-time
employees as defined and described in section 4980H of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, and the regulations for such section, at the
qualified location or locations for each year of the performance period, the
opportunity to enroll in minimum essential coverage under an eligible employer-
sponsored plan, as those terms are defined and described in section 5000A of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the regulations for such
section; and
(iii) The taxpayer must offer a sufficient package of benefits as
described in subdivision (1)(j) of section 77-6828.
(2) A taxpayer meeting the requirements of subsection (1) of this section
shall be entitled to the following sales and use tax incentives:
(a) A refund of all sales and use taxes paid under the Local Option
Revenue Act, the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, the Qualified Judgment Payment
Act, and sections 13-319, 13-324, and 13-2813 from the date of the complete
application through the meeting of the required levels of employment and
investment for all purchases, including rentals, of:
(i) Qualified property used at the qualified location or locations;
(ii) Property, excluding motor vehicles, based in this state and used in
both this state and another state in connection with the qualified location or
locations except when any such property is to be used for fundraising for or
for the transportation of an elected official;
(iii) Tangible personal property by a contractor or repairperson after
appointment as a purchasing agent of the owner of the improvement to real
estate when such property is incorporated into real estate at the qualified
location or locations. The refund shall be based on fifty percent of the
contract price, excluding any land, as the cost of materials subject to the
sales and use tax;
(iv) Tangible personal property by a contractor or repairperson after
appointment as a purchasing agent of the taxpayer when such property is annexed
to, but not incorporated into, real estate at the qualified location or
locations. The refund shall be based on the cost of materials subject to the
sales and use tax that were annexed to real estate; and
(v) Tangible personal property by a contractor or repairperson after
appointment as a purchasing agent of the taxpayer when such property is both
(A) incorporated into real estate at the qualified location or locations and
(B) annexed to, but not incorporated into, real estate at the qualified
location or locations. The refund shall be based on fifty percent of the
contract price, excluding any land, as the cost of materials subject to the
sales and use tax; and
(b) An exemption from all sales and use taxes under the Local Option
Revenue Act, the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, the Qualified Judgment Payment
Act, and sections 13-319, 13-324, and 13-2813 on the types of purchases,
including rentals, listed in subdivision (a) of this subsection for such
purchases, including rentals, occurring during each year of the performance
period in which the taxpayer is at or above the required levels of employment
and investment, except that the exemption shall be for the actual materials
purchased with respect to subdivisions (2)(a)(iii), (iv), and (v) of this
section. The Tax Commissioner shall issue such rules, regulations,
certificates, and forms as are appropriate to implement the efficient use of
this exemption.
(3)(a) Upon execution of the agreement, the taxpayer shall be issued a
direct payment permit under section 77-2705.01, notwithstanding the three
million dollars in purchases limitation in subsection (1) of section
77-2705.01, for each qualified location specified in the agreement, unless the
taxpayer has opted out of this requirement in the agreement. For any taxpayer
who is issued a direct payment permit, until such taxpayer makes the investment
in qualified property and hires the new employees at the qualified location or
locations as specified in subsection (1) of this section, the taxpayer must pay
and remit any applicable sales and use taxes as required by the Tax
Commissioner.
(b) If the taxpayer makes the investment in qualified property and hires
the new employees at the qualified location or locations as specified in
subsection (1) of this section, the taxpayer shall receive the sales tax
refunds described in subdivision (2)(a) of this section. For any year in which
the taxpayer is not at the required levels of employment and investment, the
taxpayer shall report all sales and use taxes owed for the period on the
taxpayer's tax return.
(4) The taxpayer shall be entitled to one of the following credits for
payment of wages to new employees:
(a)(i) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified property
of at least one million dollars and hires at least ten new employees at the
qualified location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period, the
taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to four percent times the average
wage of new employees times the number of new employees. Wages in excess of one
million dollars paid to any one employee during the year shall be excluded from
the calculations under this subdivision;
(ii) If the taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified property
of at least one million dollars and hires at least ten new employees at the
qualified location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period and the
number of new employees and investment are at a qualified location in a county
in Nebraska with a population of one hundred thousand or greater, and at which
-6-

LB355 LB355
2025 2025
the majority of the business activities conducted are described in subdivision
(1)(a) or (1)(n) of section 77-6818, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit
equal to four percent times the average wage of new employees times the number
of new employees. Wages in excess of one million dollars paid to any one
employee during the year shall be excluded from the calculations under this
subdivision; or
(iii) If the taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least one million dollars and hires at least ten new employees
at the qualified location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period and
the number of new employees and investment are at a qualified location or
locations within one or more counties in Nebraska that each have a population
of less than one hundred thousand, and at which the majority of the business
activities conducted are described in subdivision (1)(a) or (1)(n) of section
77-6818, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to six percent times
the average wage of new employees times the number of new employees. For
purposes of meeting the ten-employee requirement of this subdivision, the
number of new employees shall be multiplied by two. Wages in excess of one
million dollars paid to any one employee during the year shall be excluded from
the calculations under this subdivision;
(b) If a taxpayer hires at least twenty new employees at the qualified
location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period, the taxpayer shall
be entitled to a credit equal to five percent times the average wage of new
employees times the number of new employees if the average wage of the new
employees equals at least one hundred percent of the Nebraska statewide average
hourly wage for the year of application. The credit shall equal seven percent
times the average wage of new employees times the number of new employees if
the average wage of the new employees equals at least one hundred fifty percent
of the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for the year of application. The
credit shall equal nine percent times the average wage of new employees times
the number of new employees if the average wage of the new employees equals at
least two hundred percent of the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for the
year of application. Wages in excess of one million dollars paid to any one
employee during the year shall be excluded from the calculations under this
subdivision;
(c) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified property of
at least five million dollars and hires at least thirty new employees at the
qualified location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period, the
taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to five percent times the average
wage of new employees times the number of new employees if the average wage of
the new employees equals at least one hundred percent of the Nebraska statewide
average hourly wage for the year of application. The credit shall equal seven
percent times the average wage of new employees times the number of new
employees if the average wage of the new employees equals at least one hundred
fifty percent of the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for the year of
application. The credit shall equal nine percent times the average wage of new
employees times the number of new employees if the average wage of the new
employees equals at least two hundred percent of the Nebraska statewide average
hourly wage for the year of application. Wages in excess of one million dollars
paid to any one employee during the year shall be excluded from the
calculations under this subdivision;
(d) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified property of
at least two hundred fifty million dollars and hires at least two hundred fifty
new employees at the qualified location or locations before the end of the
ramp-up period, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to seven
percent times the average wage of new employees times the number of new
employees if the average wage of the new employees equals at least one hundred
fifty percent of the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for the year of
application. The credit shall equal nine percent times the average wage of new
employees times the number of new employees if the average wage of the new
employees equals at least two hundred percent of the Nebraska statewide average
hourly wage for the year of application. Wages in excess of one million dollars
paid to any one employee during the year shall be excluded from the
calculations under this subdivision; or
(e) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified property of
at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars but less than one million dollars
and hires at least five new employees at the qualified location or locations
before the end of the ramp-up period and the number of new employees and
investment are at a qualified location within an economic redevelopment area,
the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to six percent times the
average wage of new employees times the number of new employees if the average
wage of the new employees equals at least seventy percent of the Nebraska
statewide average hourly wage for the year of application. Wages in excess of
one million dollars paid to any one employee during the year shall be excluded
from the calculations under this subdivision. For purposes of this subdivision,
economic redevelopment area means an area in which (i) the average rate of
unemployment in the area during the period covered by the most recent federal
decennial census or American Community Survey 5-Year Estimate is at least one
hundred fifty percent of the average rate of unemployment in the state during
the same period and (ii) the average poverty rate in the area exceeds twenty
percent for the total federal census tract or tracts or federal census block
group or block groups in the area.
(5) The taxpayer shall be entitled to one of the following credits for new
investment:
-7-

LB355 LB355
2025 2025
(a)(i) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified property
of at least one million dollars and hires at least ten new employees at the
qualified location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period, the
taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to four percent of the investment
made in qualified property at the qualified location or locations;
(ii) If the taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified property
of at least one million dollars and hires at least ten new employees at the
qualified location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period and the
number of new employees and investment are at a qualified location in a county
in Nebraska with a population of one hundred thousand or greater, and at which
the majority of the business activities conducted are described in subdivision
(1)(a) or (1)(n) of section 77-6818, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit
equal to four percent of the investment made in qualified property at the
qualified location or locations unless the cumulative investment exceeds ten
million dollars, in which case the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal
to seven percent of the investment made in qualified property at the qualified
location or locations; or
(iii) If the taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least one million dollars and hires at least ten new employees
at the qualified location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period and
the number of new employees and investment are at a qualified location or
locations within one or more counties in Nebraska that each have a population
of less than one hundred thousand, and at which the majority of the business
activities conducted are described in subdivision (1)(a) or (1)(n) of section
77-6818, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to four percent of
the investment made in qualified property at the qualified location or
locations unless the cumulative investment exceeds ten million dollars, in
which case the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to seven percent of
the investment made in qualified property at the qualified location or
locations. For purposes of meeting the ten-employee requirement of this
subdivision, the number of new employees shall be multiplied by two;
(b) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified property of
at least five million dollars and hires at least thirty new employees at the
qualified location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period, the
taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to seven percent of the investment
made in qualified property at the qualified location or locations;
(c) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified property of
at least two hundred fifty million dollars and hires at least two hundred fifty
new employees at the qualified location or locations before the end of the
ramp-up period, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to seven
percent of the investment made in qualified property at the qualified location
or locations; or
(d) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified property of
at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars but less than one million dollars
and hires at least five new employees at the qualified location or locations
before the end of the ramp-up period and the number of new employees and
investment are at a qualified location within an economic redevelopment area,
the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to four percent of the
investment made in qualified property at the qualified location or locations.
For purposes of this subdivision, economic redevelopment area means an area in
which (i) the average rate of unemployment in the area during the period
covered by the most recent federal decennial census or American Community
Survey 5-Year Estimate is at least one hundred fifty percent of the average
rate of unemployment in the state during the same period and (ii) the average
poverty rate in the area exceeds twenty percent for the total federal census
tract or tracts or federal census block group or block groups in the area.
(6)(a) The credit percentages prescribed in subdivisions (4)(a), (b), (c),
and (d) and subdivisions (5)(a), (b), and (c) of this section shall be
increased by one percentage point for wages paid and investments made at
qualified locations in an extremely blighted area. For purposes of this
subdivision, extremely blighted area means an area which, before the end of the
ramp-up period, has been declared an extremely blighted area under section
18-2101.02.
(b) The credit percentages prescribed in subsections (4) and (5) of this
section shall be increased by one percentage point if the taxpayer:
(i) Is a benefit corporation as defined in section 21-403 and has been
such a corporation for at least one year prior to submitting an application
under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act; and
(ii) Remains a benefit corporation as defined in section 21-403 for the
duration of the taxpayer's agreement under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act.
(c) A taxpayer may, if qualified, receive one or both of the increases
provided in this subsection.
(7)(a) The credits prescribed in subsections (4) and (5) of this section
shall be allowable for wages paid and investments made during each year of the
performance period that the taxpayer is at or above the required levels of
employment and investment.
(b) The credits prescribed in subsection (5) of this section shall also be
allowable during the first year of the performance period for investment in
qualified property at the qualified location or locations after the date of the
complete application and before the beginning of the performance period.
(8)(a) Property described in subdivision (8)(c) of this section used at
the qualified location or locations, whether purchased or leased, and placed in
service by the taxpayer after the date of the complete application, shall
-8-

LB355 LB355
2025 2025
constitute separate classes of property and are eligible for exemption under
the conditions and for the time periods provided in subdivision (8)(b) of this
section.
(b) A taxpayer shall receive the exemption of property in subdivision (8)
(c) of this section if the taxpayer attains one of the following employment and
investment levels: (i) Cumulative investment in qualified property of at least
five million dollars and the hiring of at least thirty new employees at the
qualified location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period; (ii)
cumulative investment in qualified property of at least fifty million dollars
at the qualified location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period,
provided the average compensation of the taxpayer's employees at the qualified
location or locations for the year in which such investment level was attained
equals at least one hundred fifty percent of the Nebraska statewide average
hourly wage for the year of application and the taxpayer offers to its
employees who constitute full-time employees as defined and described in
section 4980H of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the
regulations for such section, at the qualified location or locations for the
year in which such investment level was attained, the opportunity to enroll in
minimum essential coverage under an eligible employer-sponsored plan, as those
terms are defined and described in section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, as amended, and the regulations for such section; or (iii) cumulative
investment in qualified property of at least two hundred fifty million dollars
and the hiring of at least two hundred fifty new employees at the qualified
location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period. Such property shall
be eligible for the exemption from the first January 1 following the end of the
year during which the required levels were exceeded through the ninth December
31 after the first year property included in subdivision (8)(c) of this section
qualifies for the exemption, except that for a taxpayer who has filed an
application under NAICS code 518210 for Data Processing, Hosting, and Related
Services and who files a separate sequential application for the same NAICS
code for which the ramp-up period begins with the year immediately after the
end of the previous project's performance period or a taxpayer who has a
project qualifying under subdivision (1)(b)(ii) of section 77-5725 and who
files a separate sequential application for NAICS code 518210 for Data
Processing, Hosting, and Related Services for which the ramp-up period begins
with the year immediately after the end of the previous project's entitlement
period, such property described in subdivision (8)(c)(i) of this section shall
be eligible for the exemption from the first January 1 following the placement
in service of such property through the ninth December 31 after the year the
first claim for exemption is approved.
(c) The following personal property used at the qualified location or
locations, whether purchased or leased, and placed in service by the taxpayer
after the date of the complete application shall constitute separate classes of
personal property:
(i) All personal property that constitutes a data center if the taxpayer
qualifies under subdivision (8)(b)(i) or (8)(b)(ii) of this section;
(ii) Business equipment that is located at a qualified location or
locations and that is involved directly in the manufacture or processing of
agricultural products, including business equipment used primarily for the
capture and compression of carbon dioxide, the manufacturing of liquid
fertilizer or any other chemical applied to agricultural crops, or the
manufacturing of any liquid additive for a farm vehicle fuel if the taxpayer
qualifies under subdivision (8)(b)(i) or (8)(b)(ii) of this section; or
(iii) All personal property if the taxpayer qualifies under subdivision
(8)(b)(iii) of this section.
(d) In order to receive the property tax exemptions allowed by subdivision
(8)(c) of this section, the taxpayer shall annually file a claim for exemption
with the Tax Commissioner on or before May 1. The form and supporting schedules
shall be prescribed by the Tax Commissioner and shall list all property for
which exemption is being sought under this section. A separate claim for
exemption must be filed for each agreement and each county in which property is
claimed to be exempt. A copy of this form must also be filed with the county
assessor in each county in which the applicant is requesting exemption. The Tax
Commissioner shall determine whether a taxpayer is eligible to obtain exemption
for personal property based on the criteria for exemption and the eligibility
of each item listed for exemption and, on or before August 1, certify such
determination to the taxpayer and to the affected county assessor.
(9) The taxpayer shall, on or before the receipt or use of any incentives
under this section, pay to the director a fee of one-half percent of such
incentives, except for the exemption on personal property, for administering
the ImagiNE Nebraska Act, except that the fee on any sales tax exemption may be
paid by the taxpayer with the filing of its sales and use tax return. Such fee
may be paid by direct payment to the director or through withholding of
available refunds. A credit shall be allowed against such fee for the amount of
the fee paid with the application. All fees collected under this subsection
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the ImagiNE Nebraska
Cash Fund, which fund is hereby created. The fund shall consist of fees
credited under this subsection and any other money appropriated to the fund by
the Legislature. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Economic
Development and shall be used for administration of the ImagiNE Nebraska Act.
Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
-9-

LB355 LB355
2025 2025
Sec. 5. Section 77-6906, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-6906 Economic redevelopment area means an area in the State of Nebraska
in which:
(1) The average rate of unemployment in the area during the period covered
by the most recent federal decennial census or American Community Survey 5-Year
Estimate by the United States Bureau of the Census is at least one hundred
fifty percent of the average rate of unemployment in the state during the same
period; and
(2) The average poverty rate in the area is twenty percent or more for the
federal census tract in the area.
Sec. 6. Section 81-1203, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-1203 (1) A business applying for a job training grant, other than a
grant provided under subsection (3) of section 81-1201.21, shall submit a
business plan to the Department of Economic Development which includes, but is
not limited to:
(a) The number of jobs to be created or the number of existing positions
that will be retrained;
(b) The nature of the business and the type of jobs to be created or
positions to be retrained;
(c) The estimated wage levels of the jobs to be created or positions to be
retrained; and
(d) A program schedule for the job training project.
(2) A business applying for a job training grant, other than a grant
provided under subsection (3) of section 81-1201.21, must demonstrate that the
job training project to be conducted pursuant to the grant meets the following
criteria:
(a) The wage level of the jobs created will meet the local prevailing
average;
(b) The jobs created will diversify the local economy;
(c) The goods or services produced by the company will be export-oriented;
(d) Seventy-five percent of the jobs created will be full-time jobs; and
(e) The new jobs will be created within three calendar years.
(3) A business applying for a training grant under subsection (3) of
section 81-1201.21 may partner with a postsecondary educational institution; a
private, nonprofit organization holding a certificate of exemption under
section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; or a learning community
coordinating council or school district that has partnered with a private,
nonprofit organization. The application shall specify the role of the
partnering entity in identifying and training potential job applicants for the
applicant business.
(4) A business applying for a training grant under subsection (3) of
section 81-1201.21 may apply as a business that has established a program under
which residents of rural areas or high-poverty areas are trained for employment
or potential employment by documenting:
(a) That the business has established a program designed to fill a minimum
of four positions in rural areas and a minimum of eight positions in high-
poverty areas for such business;
(b) A program schedule for the training project;
(c) The nature of the business and the number of positions available or to
be created;
(d) That the wage level of the positions available or to be created will
meet the local prevailing average;
(e) The value of the positions available or to be created in diversifying
the local economy;
(f) That a minimum of seventy-five percent of the positions available or
to be created will be full-time jobs;
(g) That the business will accept funding on behalf of trainees and will
provide a match of a minimum of twenty-five percent of the value of the grant,
either monetarily or through in-kind services, as part of the training for each
trainee;
(h) That any new position created will be done within three calendar
years;
(i) That the number of trainees will not exceed one hundred twenty-five
percent of the number of positions that will be available at the time of
application; and
(j) That the goods or services produced by the business are generally
exportable in nature resulting in additional money to the community or the
state and the positions available or to be created are not local retail
positions.
(5) Each business participating in a training grant under subsection (3)
of section 81-1201.21 shall be subject to an audit by the Department of
Economic Development and shall annually report or provide to the department the
following information:
(a) The percentage of trainees who have successfully completed the
training;
(b) The percentage of trainees that such business hired;
(c) An itemized description of such business's match including
expenditures per trainee; and
(d) A copy of the training curriculum.
(6) For purposes of subsections (3) through (5) of this section:
(a) High-poverty area means an area consisting of one or more contiguous
-10-

LB355 LB355
2025 2025
census tracts, as determined by the most recent American Community Survey 5-
Year Estimate federal decennial census, which contain a percentage of persons
with incomes below the poverty line of greater than thirty percent, and all
census tracts contiguous to such tract or tracts , as determined by the most
recent federal decennial census; and
(b) Private, nonprofit organization means an organization whose purpose is
providing basic job and life skills training to individuals in need of such
training in rural or high-poverty areas.
Sec. 7. Section 81-12,108, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,108 For purposes of the Nebraska Innovation Hub Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Economic Development;
(2) Director means the Director of Economic Development;
(3) Economic redevelopment area means an area in the State of Nebraska in
which:
(a) The average rate of unemployment in the area during the period covered
by the most recent federal decennial census or American Community Survey 5-Year
Estimate by the United States Bureau of the Census is at least one hundred
fifty percent of the average rate of unemployment in the state during the same
period; and
(b) The average poverty rate in the area is twenty percent or more for the
federal census tract in the area;
(4) iHub area means the geographical area in this state in which an iHub
will operate. An iHub area shall be located within:
(a) An economic redevelopment area;
(b) An enterprise zone designated pursuant to the Enterprise Zone Act;
(c) An inland port district as defined in section 13-3303;
(d) Thirty miles of the largest artificial reservoir constructed in this
state for the storage of water; or
(e) Any county having a population of less than one hundred thousand
inhabitants;
(5) iHub partner means an entity described in section 81-12,111 that
collaborates with an iHub for purposes of driving economic growth within an
iHub area;
(6) Innovation hub or iHub means a private nonprofit corporation that is
designated by the director as an iHub or an inland port authority created under
the Municipal Inland Port Authority Act; and
(7) Postsecondary educational institution means a two-year or four-year
college or university which is a member institution of an accrediting body
recognized by the United States Department of Education.
Sec. 8. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 9. Original sections 13-1906, 81-1203, and 81-12,108, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 13-2610, 18-2103, 77-6831, and
77-6906, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 10. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-11-